Utah statutes.
62A-4a-708.   Existing authority for child placement continues.
Any person who, under any law of this state other than this part or the
interstate compact established under Section 62A-4a-701, has authority to make
or assist in making the placement of a child, shall continue to have the
ability lawfully to make or assist in making that placement, and the
provisions of Part 6 of this chapter and of Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 1, Utah
Adoption Act, continue to apply.
